Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2131
Fees.

The total fee for filing the documents required by sections 44-2126 to 44-2130 and all amendments to such filings shall be one thousand dollars. The initial fee for registration required by the provisions of section 44-2132 shall be one thousand dollars, and an additional fee of two hundred dollars shall be payable on May 1 of each calendar year thereafter so long as such registration continues. The fees provided for by this section shall be payable to the Department of Insurance and shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Insurance Cash Fund.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 34;

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 84;

Laws 2005, LB 119, § 10.